Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF766.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.2231, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Peace officers. (a) As used in this subdivision, "peace officer" means a person who is licensed under section 626.845, subdivision 1, and effecting a lawful arrest or executing any other duty imposed by law. (b) Whoever physically assaults a peace officer is guilty of a deleted text begin gross misdemeanordeleted text end new text begin felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than two years or to payment of a fine of not more than $4,000, or bothnew text end . (c) Whoever commits either of the following acts against a peace officer is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than three years or to payment of a fine of not more than $6,000, or both: (1) physically assaults the officer if the assault inflicts demonstrable bodily harm; or (2) intentionally throws or otherwise transfers bodily fluids or feces at or onto the officer. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end